Utah statutes.
48-2a-109.   Articles of conversion.

The articles of conversion shall state:

(1)  the date on which and jurisdiction where the subject entity was first created, formed, incorporated, or otherwise came into being and, if it has changed, its jurisdiction immediately prior to its conversion to a domestic limited partnership;

(2)  the name of the subject entity immediately prior to the filing of the articles of conversion;

(3)  the name of the domestic limited partnership as set forth in its certificate of limited partnership filed in accordance with Section 48-2a-201;

(4)  the future effective date or time, which shall be a date or time certain, of the conversion to a domestic limited partnership if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the articles of conversion and the certificate of limited partnership; and

(5)  that the conversion has been duly approved by the owners of the subject entity.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

